Utah statutes.
78B-9-402.   Petition for determination of factual innocence -- Sufficient
allegations -- Notification of victim.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Factually innocent" means a person did not:
(a)  engage in the conduct for which the person was convicted;
(b)  engage in conduct relating to any lesser included offenses; or
(c)  commit any other felony arising out of or reasonably connected to the
facts supporting the indictment or information upon which the person was
convicted.
(2) (a)  A person who has been convicted of a felony offense may petition the
district court in the county in which the person was convicted for a hearing
to establish that the person is factually innocent of the crime or crimes of
which the person was convicted, if the person asserts factual innocence under
oath and the petition alleges:
(i)  newly discovered material evidence exists that establishes that the
petitioner is factually innocent;
(ii)  the petitioner identifies the specific evidence the petitioner claims
establishes innocence;
(iii)  the material evidence is not merely cumulative of evidence that was
known;
(iv)  the material evidence is not merely impeachment evidence;
(v)  viewed with all the other evidence, the newly discovered evidence
demonstrates that the petitioner is factually innocent; and
(vi) (A)  neither the petitioner nor petitioner's counsel knew of the evidence
at the time of trial or sentencing or in time to include the evidence in any
previously filed post-trial motion or postconviction motion, and the evidence
could not have been discovered by the petitioner or the petitioner's counsel
through the exercise of reasonable diligence;
(B)  a court has found ineffective assistance of counsel for failing to
exercise reasonable diligence in uncovering the evidence; or
(C)  the court waives the requirements of Subsection (2)(a)(vi)(A) or
(2)(a)(vi)(B) in the interest of justice.
(b)  A person who has already obtained postconviction relief that vacated or
reversed the person's conviction may also file a petition under this part if
no retrial or appeal regarding this offense is pending.
(3)  If some or all of the evidence alleged to be exonerating is biological
evidence subject to DNA testing, the petitioner shall seek DNA testing
pursuant to Section 78B-9-301.
(4) Except as provided in Subsection (6), the petition shall be in compliance
with and governed by Rule 65C, Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, and shall
include the underlying criminal case number.
(5)  After a petition is filed under this section, prosecutors, law
enforcement officers, and crime laboratory personnel shall cooperate in
preserving evidence and in determining the sufficiency of the chain of custody
of the evidence which is the subject of the petition.
(6) (a)  Notwithstanding paragraphs (g) and (h) of Rule 65C, Utah Rules of
Civil Procedure, a person who files a petition under this section shall serve
notice of the petition and a copy of the petition upon the office of the
prosecutor who obtained the conviction and upon the Utah attorney general.
The attorney general shall, within 30 days after receipt of service of the
notice, or within any additional period of time the court allows, answer or
otherwise respond to all proceedings initiated under this part.
(b) (i)  After the time for response by the attorney general under Subsection
(6)(a) has passed, the court shall order a hearing if it finds there is a bona
fide issue as to whether the petitioner is factually innocent of the charges
of which the petitioner was convicted.
(ii)  If the parties stipulate that the evidence establishes that the
petitioner is factually innocent, the court may find the petitioner is
factually innocent without holding a hearing.
(7)  The court may not grant a petition for a hearing under this part during
the period in which criminal proceedings in the matter are pending before any
trial or appellate court, unless stipulated to by the parties.
(8)  Any victim of a crime that is the subject of a petition under this part,
and who has elected to receive notice under Section 77-38-3, shall be notified
by the state's attorney of any hearing regarding the petition.
